Georgia, session 2025_26, SB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended by
repealing Chapter 2B, relating to promise scholarship accounts, in its entirety.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 134
- 1 -